California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) A Certified Interior Designer shall use a written contract when contracting to provide interior design services to a client pursuant to this chapter. The written contract shall be executed by the Certified Interior Designer and the client, or the client’s representative, prior to the Certified Interior Designer commencing work. The written contract shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A description of the services to be provided to the client by the Certified Interior Designer.

(2) A description of any basis of compensation applicable to the contract and the method of payment agreed upon by the
 parties.

(3) The name, address, and certification number of the Certified Interior Designer and the name and address of the client.

(4) A description of the procedure that the Certified Interior Designer and the client will use to accommodate additional services.

(5) A description of the procedure to be used by any party to terminate the contract.

(6) A three-day rescission clause in accordance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1688) of Title 5 of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(7) A written disclosure stating whether the Certified Interior Designer carries errors and omissions
 insurance.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Interior design services rendered by a Certified Interior Designer for which the client will not pay compensation.

(2) Interior design services rendered by a Certified Interior Designer to any of the following:

(A) An architect licensed under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500).

(B) A landscape architect licensed under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 5615).

(C) An engineer licensed under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700).

(c) As used in this section, “written contract” includes a contract in electronic form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 29.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5810.)
-------------------------------------------

5810.

(a) This chapter shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(b) This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 311, Sec. 1.   (SB 1437)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.9, comprising Sections 5800 to 5812.)
-------------------------------------------

5811.

(a) The California Council for Interior Design Certification, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 5800, is hereby established to carry out the responsibilities and duties set forth in this chapter.

(b) The meetings of the council issuing stamps under Section 5801 shall be subject to the rules of the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(c) The council may take reasonable actions to carry out its responsibilities and duties, as set forth in this chapter.

(d) The council may adopt bylaws, rules, and procedures necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

(e) The council may establish application fees, renewal fees, and other fees related to the regulatory costs of providing services and carrying out the council’s responsibilities and duties pursuant to this chapter. These fees shall not exceed the reasonable costs to the council of providing those services and carrying out those responsibilities and duties.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5811.1 by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 30.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5810.)
-------------------------------------------

5811.1.

(a) The council may issue a certification to any applicant who provides satisfactory evidence that they meet all of the requirements of this chapter and who complies with the bylaws, rules, and procedures established by the council.

(1) In order to obtain a certification, an applicant shall submit an application as provided by the council and provide the council with satisfactory evidence that they meet all of the following requirements:

(A) Passage of an interior design examination approved by the council.

(B) Any of the following education and experience pathways:

(i) The person is a graduate of a four- or five-year accredited interior design degree program, and has two years of diversified interior design experience.

(ii) The person has completed a three-year accredited interior design certificate program, and has completed three years of diversified interior design experience.

(iii) The person has completed a two-year accredited interior design program and has completed four years of diversified interior design experience.

(iv) The person has at least eight years of interior design education, or at least eight years of diversified interior design experience, or a combination of interior design education and diversified interior design experience that together total at least eight years.

(C) All fees required by the council, as described in subdivision (e) of Section 5811, have been paid.

(2) The council may issue a commercial designation to a Certified Interior Designer or qualified applicant who, in addition to the requirements in paragraph (1), passes additional interior design courses and examinations, as determined to be required by the council.

(b) (1)
   Any certificate under this chapter shall be subject to renewal every two years in a manner prescribed by the council, and shall expire unless renewed in that manner. The council may provide for the late renewal of a registration.

(2) The council may require Certified Interior Designers to complete continuing education specific to the practice of interior design each two-year certification cycle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 31.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5810.)
-------------------------------------------

5812.

It is an unfair business practice for any person to represent or hold themselves out as, or to use the title “Certified Interior Designer” or any other term, such as “licensed,” “registered,” or “CID,” that implies or suggests that the person is certified as an interior designer when they do not hold a valid certification as provided in Sections 5800 and 5801.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 32.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5810.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Attorneys [6000. - 6256.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [6000. - 6009.5.]

6000.

This chapter of the Business and Professions Code constitutes the chapter on attorneys. It may be cited as the State Bar Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

6001.

(a) The State Bar of California is a public corporation. It is hereinafter designated as the State Bar.

(b) The State Bar has perpetual succession and a seal and it may sue and be sued. It may, for the purpose of carrying into effect and promoting its objectives:

(1) Make contracts.

(2) Borrow money, contract debts, issue bonds, notes, and debentures, and secure the payment or performance of its obligations.

(3) Own, hold,
 use, manage, and deal in and with real and personal property.

(4) Construct, alter, maintain, and repair buildings and other improvements to real property.

(5) Purchase, lease, obtain options upon, acquire by gift, bequest, devise, or otherwise, any real or personal property or any interest therein.

(6) Sell, lease, exchange, convey, transfer, assign, encumber, pledge, or dispose of any of its real or personal property or any interest therein, including without limitation all or any portion of its income or revenues from license fees paid or payable by licensees.

(7) Do all other acts incidental to the foregoing or necessary or expedient for the administration of its affairs and the attainment of its purposes.

(c) Pursuant to those powers enumerated in
 subdivision (b), it is recognized that the State Bar has authority to raise revenue in addition to that provided for in Section 6140 and other statutory provisions. The State Bar is empowered to raise that additional revenue by any lawful means. However, as of March 31, 2018, the State Bar shall not create any foundations or nonprofit corporations.

(d) The State Bar shall conspicuously publicize to its licensees in the annual fees statement and other appropriate communications, including its internet website and electronic communications, that its
 licensees have the right to limit the sale or disclosure of licensee information not reasonably related to regulatory purposes. In those communications the State Bar shall note the location of the State Bar’s privacy policy, and shall also note the simple procedure by which a licensee may exercise the licensee’s right to prohibit or restrict, at the licensee’s option, the sale or disclosure of licensee information not reasonably related to regulatory purposes. On or before May 1, 2005, the State Bar shall report to the Assembly and Senate Committees on Judiciary regarding the procedures that it has in place to ensure that licensees can appropriately limit the use of their licensee information not reasonably related to regulatory purposes, and the number of licensees choosing to utilize these procedures.

(e) (1) No law of this state restricting, or prescribing a mode of procedure for the exercise of powers of state public bodies or state agencies, or classes thereof, including, but not by way of limitation, the provisions contained in Division 3 (commencing with Section 11000), Division 4 (commencing with Section 16100), and Part 1 (commencing with Section 18000) and Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5, of Title 2 of the Government Code, shall be applicable to the State Bar, unless the Legislature expressly so declares.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) or any other law, pursuant to Sections 6026.7 and 6026.11, the State Bar is subject to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and, commencing April 1, 2016, the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) or any other law, members of the board of trustees of the State Bar and employees of the State Bar shall be subject to the conflicts of interest provisions relating to contracts in Sections 1090 to 1097.2, inclusive, set forth in Article 4 of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, and members of the board of trustees of the State Bar shall be deemed state
 officers and employees of the State Bar shall be deemed state employees thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 697, Sec. 2.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6001.1.

Protection of the public, which includes support for greater access to, and inclusion in, the legal system, shall be the highest priority for the State Bar of California and the board of trustees in exercising their licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 3.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6001.3.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Bar maintain its commitment to and support of effective policies and activities to enhance access, fairness, and diversity in the legal profession and the elimination of bias in the practice of law.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) The rich diversity of the people of California requires a justice system that is equally accessible and free of bias and is a core value of the legal profession.

(2) Diversity and inclusion are an integral part of the State Bar’s public protection mission to build,
 retain, and maintain a diverse legal profession to provide quality and culturally sensitive services to an ever-increasing diverse population.

(3) Diversity increases public trust and confidence and the appearance of fairness in the justice system and therefore increases access to justice.

(4) The State Bar should continue to increase diversity and inclusion in the legal profession.

(c) The State Bar shall develop and implement a plan to meet the goals set forth in this section, which may include, but is not limited to, an assessment of needed revenue. The State Bar shall prepare and submit a report to the Legislature, by March 30, 2019, and every two years thereafter, on the plan and its implementation, including
 a description of activities undertaken to support the plan, their outcomes, and their effectiveness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 697, Sec. 3.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6001.4.

Commencing on or before February 1, 2011, the State Bar shall make available, upon request of a member of the public, the classification and total annual compensation paid to each of its employees by name, as well as any and all rules, policies, and agreements pertaining to the compensation and benefits of any employees of the State Bar.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 476, Sec. 2.   (AB 2764)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6001.5.

(a) The State Bar of California shall require that all employees and prospective employees, and may require volunteers, contractors, and subcontractors, to submit fingerprints to the Department of Justice and to the Federal Bureau of Investigation in order to establish identity and to determine whether the individual has a record of criminal conviction in this state or in other states, including through a national criminal history check.

(b) The State Bar shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for all employees, prospective employees, volunteers, contractors, and subcontractors, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of
 Justice shall provide a state or federal level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 697, Sec. 4.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.

(a) The licensees of the State Bar are all persons admitted and licensed to practice law in this state except justices and judges of courts of record during their continuance in office.

(b) As used in this chapter or any other provision of law, “member of the State Bar” shall be deemed to refer to a licensee of the State Bar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 6.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.1.

(a) A licensee of the State Bar shall maintain all of the following on the official licensing records of the State Bar:

(1) The licensee’s current office address and telephone number or, if no office is maintained, the address to be used for State Bar purposes or purposes of the agency charged with attorney discipline.

(2) All specialties in which the licensee is certified.

(3) Any other jurisdictions in which the licensee is admitted and the dates of their admission.

(4) The jurisdiction, and the nature and date of any discipline imposed by another jurisdiction, including
 the terms and conditions of any probation imposed, and, if suspended or disbarred in another jurisdiction, the date of any reinstatement in that jurisdiction.

(5) Any other information as may be required by agreement with or by conditions of probation imposed by the agency charged with attorney discipline.

A licensee shall notify the licensing records office of the State Bar of any change in the information required by paragraphs (1), (4), and (5) within 30 days of any change and of the change in the information required by paragraphs (2) and (3) on or before the date set by the State Bar for payment of license fees pursuant to Section 6140 or 6141.

(b) Every former licensee of the State Bar who has been ordered by the Supreme Court to comply with Rule 9.20 of the California Rules of Court shall maintain on the official licensing records
 of the State Bar the former licensee’s current address and within 10 days after any change therein, shall file a change of address with a licensing records office of the State Bar until such time as the former licensee is no longer subject to the order.

(c) The notice initiating a proceeding conducted under this chapter may be served upon the licensee or former licensee of the State Bar to whom it is directed by certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the licensee or former licensee at the latest address shown on the official licensing records of the State Bar. The service is complete at the time of the mailing but any prescribed period of notice and any right or duty to do any act or make any response within any prescribed period or on a date certain after the notice is served by mail shall be extended five days if the place of address is within the State of California, 10 days if the place of address is outside the State of
 California but within the United States, and 20 days if the place of address is outside the United States. A licensee of the State Bar or former licensee may waive the requirements of this subdivision and may, with the written consent of another licensee of the State Bar, designate that other licensee to receive service of any notice or papers in any proceeding conducted under this chapter.

(d) The State Bar shall not make available to the general public the information specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) unless that information is required to be made available by a condition of probation. That information is, however, available to the State Bar, the Supreme Court, or the agency charged with attorney discipline.

(e) The State Bar may develop a prescribed form for the making of reports required by this section, usage of which it may require by rule or
 regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 227, Sec. 1.   (AB 3279)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6003.

Licensees of the State Bar are divided into two classes:

(a) Active licensees.

(b) Inactive licensees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 8.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6004.

Every licensee of the State Bar is an active licensee until as in Section 6007 of this code provided or at the licensee’s request, the licensee is enrolled as an inactive licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 9.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6005.

Inactive licensees are those licensees who have requested that they be enrolled as inactive licensees or who have been enrolled as inactive licensees as set forth in Section 6007.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 10.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6006.

(a) Active licensees who retire from practice shall be enrolled as inactive licensees at their request.

(b) Inactive licensees are not entitled to practice law. Those who are enrolled as inactive licensees at their request may, on application and payment of all fees required, become active licensees. Those who are or have been enrolled as inactive licensees at their request are licensees of the State Bar for purposes of Section 15 of Article VI of the California Constitution. Those who are enrolled as inactive licensees pursuant to Section 6007 may become active licensees as provided in that section.

(c) Inactive licensees have such other privileges, not inconsistent with this chapter, as the board of
 trustees provides.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 405, Sec. 1.   (SB 253)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6007.

(a) When a licensee requires involuntary treatment pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 5300) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of, or Part 2 (commencing with Section 6250) of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or when under an order pursuant to Section 3051, 3106.5, or 3152 of the Welfare and Institutions Code they have been placed in or returned to inpatient status at the California Rehabilitation Center or its branches, or when they have been determined insane or mentally incompetent and is confined for treatment or placed on outpatient status pursuant to the Penal Code, or on account of their mental condition a guardian or conservator, for their estate or person or both, has been appointed, the Board of Trustees or an
 officer of the State Bar shall enroll the licensee as an inactive licensee.

The clerk of any court making an order containing any of the determinations or adjudications referred to in the immediately preceding paragraph shall send a certified copy of that order to the State Bar at the same time that the order is entered.

The clerk of any court with which is filed a notice of certification for intensive treatment pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 5250) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, upon receipt of the notice, shall transmit a certified copy of it to the State Bar.

The State Bar may procure a certified copy of any determination, order, adjudication, appointment, or notice when the clerk concerned has failed to transmit one or when the
 proceeding was had in a court other than a court of this state.

In the case of an enrollment pursuant to this subdivision, the State Bar shall terminate the enrollment when the licensee has had the fact of their restoration to capacity judicially determined, upon the licensee’s release from inpatient status at the California Rehabilitation Center or its branches pursuant to Section 3053, 3109, or 3151 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or upon the licensee’s unconditional release from the medical facility pursuant to Section 5304 or 5305 of the Welfare and Institutions Code; and on payment of all fees required.

When a licensee is placed in, returned to, or released from inpatient status at the California Rehabilitation Center or its branches, or discharged from the narcotics treatment program, the Director of
 Corrections or their designee shall transmit to the State Bar a certified notice attesting to that fact.

(b) The State Bar Court shall also enroll a licensee of the State Bar as an inactive licensee in each of the following cases:

(1) A licensee asserts a claim of insanity or mental incompetence in any pending action or proceeding, alleging their inability to understand the nature of the action or proceeding or inability to assist counsel in representation of the licensee.

(2) The court makes an order assuming jurisdiction over the licensee’s law practice, pursuant to Section 6180.5 or 6190.34.

(3) After notice and opportunity to be heard before the State Bar Court,
 the State Bar Court finds that the licensee, because of mental infirmity or illness, or because of the habitual use of intoxicants or drugs, is (i) unable or habitually fails to perform their duties or undertakings competently, or (ii) unable to practice law without substantial threat of harm to the interests of their clients or the public. No proceeding pursuant to this paragraph shall be instituted unless the State Bar Court finds, after preliminary investigation, or during the course of a disciplinary proceeding, that probable cause exists therefor. The determination of probable cause is administrative in character and no notice or hearing is required.

In the case of an enrollment pursuant to this subdivision, the State Bar Court shall terminate the enrollment upon proof that the facts found as to the licensee’s disability no longer exist and on payment
 of all fees required.

(c) (1) The State Bar Court may order the involuntary inactive enrollment of an attorney upon a finding based on all the available evidence, including affidavits, that the attorney has not complied with Section 6002.1 and cannot be located after reasonable investigation.

(2) The State Bar Court may order the involuntary inactive enrollment of an attorney if it finds, based on all the available evidence, including affidavits:

(A) The attorney has caused or is causing substantial harm to the attorney’s clients or the public.

(B) There is a reasonable probability that the chief trial counsel will prevail on the merits
 of the underlying disciplinary matter, and that the attorney will be disbarred.

(3) In the case of an enrollment under paragraph (2), the underlying matter shall proceed on an expedited basis.

(4) The State Bar Court shall order the involuntary inactive enrollment of an attorney upon the filing of a recommendation of disbarment after hearing or default. For purposes of this section, that attorney shall be placed on involuntary inactive enrollment
 regardless of the license status of the attorney at the time.

(5) The State Bar Court shall order the involuntary inactive enrollment of an attorney who is sentenced to incarceration for 90 days or more as a result of a criminal conviction for at least the period of time in which the attorney is incarcerated.

(6) The State Bar Court shall order attorneys who are placed on inactive enrollment pursuant to this subdivision to comply with Rule 9.20 of the California Rules of Court.

(7) The board shall formulate and adopt rules of procedure to implement this subdivision.

In the case of an enrollment pursuant to this subdivision, the State Bar Court shall terminate the
 involuntary inactive enrollment upon proof that the attorney’s conduct no longer poses a substantial threat of harm to the interests of the attorney’s clients or the public or where an attorney who could not be located proves compliance with Section 6002.1.

(d) (1) The State Bar Court may order the involuntary inactive enrollment of an attorney for violation of probation upon the occurrence of all of the following:

(A) The attorney is under a suspension order any portion of which has been stayed during a period of probation.

(B) The State Bar Court finds that probation has been violated.

(C) The State Bar Court recommends to the Supreme Court that
 the attorney receive an actual suspension on account of the probation violation or other disciplinary matter.

(2) The State Bar Court shall terminate an enrollment under this subdivision upon expiration of a period equal to the period of stayed suspension in the probation matter, or until the effective date of a Supreme Court order imposing an actual suspension on account of the probation violation or other disciplinary matter, whichever occurs first.

(3) If the Supreme Court orders a period of actual suspension in the probation matter, any period of involuntary inactive enrollment pursuant to this subdivision shall be credited against the period of actual suspension ordered.

(e) (1) The State
 Bar Court shall order the involuntary, inactive enrollment of a licensee whose default has been entered pursuant to the State Bar Rules of Procedure if both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The notice was duly served pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 6002.1.

(B) The notice contained the following language at or near the beginning of the notice, in capital letters:

IF YOU FAIL TO FILE AN ANSWER TO THIS NOTICE WITHIN THE TIME ALLOWED BY STATE BAR RULES, INCLUDING EXTENSIONS, OR IF YOU FAIL TO APPEAR AT THE STATE BAR COURT TRIAL, (1) YOUR DEFAULT SHALL BE ENTERED, (2) YOU SHALL BE ENROLLED AS AN INVOLUNTARY INACTIVE LICENSEE OF THE STATE BAR AND WILL NOT BE PERMITTED TO PRACTICE LAW UNLESS THE DEFAULT IS SET
 ASIDE ON MOTION TIMELY MADE UNDER THE RULES OF PROCEDURE OF THE STATE BAR, (3) YOU SHALL NOT BE PERMITTED TO PARTICIPATE FURTHER IN THESE PROCEEDINGS UNLESS YOUR DEFAULT IS SET ASIDE, AND (4) YOU SHALL BE SUBJECT TO ADDITIONAL DISCIPLINE.

(2) The State Bar Court shall terminate the involuntary inactive enrollment of a licensee under this subdivision when the licensee’s default is set aside on motion timely made under the State Bar Rules of Procedure or the disciplinary proceedings are completed.

(3) The enrollment under this subdivision is administrative in character and no hearing is required.

(4) Upon the involuntary inactive enrollment of a licensee under this subdivision, the notice required by subdivision (b) of
 Section 6092.5 shall be promptly given.

(f) The pendency or determination of a proceeding or investigation provided for by this section shall not abate or terminate a disciplinary investigation or proceeding except as required by the facts and law in a particular case.

(g) No license fees shall accrue against the licensee during the period they are enrolled as an inactive licensee pursuant to this section.

(h) The State Bar Court may order a full range of interim remedies or final discipline short of involuntary inactive enrollment, including, but not limited to, conditions of probation following final discipline, or directly ordered interim remedies, to restrict or supervise an attorney’s practice of law, as well
 as proceedings under subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d), or under Section 6102 or 6190. They may include restrictions as to scope of practice, monetary accounting procedures, review of performance by probation or other monitors appointed by the board, or such other measures as may be determined, after hearing, to protect present and future clients from likely substantial harm. These restrictions may be imposed upon a showing as provided in subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 697, Sec. 5.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6008.

All property of the State Bar is hereby declared to be held for essential public and governmental purposes in the judicial branch of the government and such property is exempt from all taxes of the State or any city, city and county, district, public corporation, or other political subdivision, public body or public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1526.)
-------------------------------------------

6008.1.

No bond, note, debenture, evidence of indebtedness, mortgage, deed of trust, assignment, pledge, contract, lease, agreement, or other contractual obligation of the State Bar shall:

(a) Create a debt or other liability of the state nor of any entity other than the State Bar (or any successor public corporation).

(b) Create any personal liability on the part of the licensees of the State Bar or the members of the board of trustees or any person executing the same, by reason of the issuance or execution thereof.

(c) Be required to be approved or authorized under the provisions of any other law or regulation of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 13.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6008.2.

Bonds, notes, debentures and other evidences of indebtedness of the State Bar are hereby declared to be issued for essential public and governmental purposes in the judicial branch of the government and, together with interest thereon and income therefrom, shall be exempt from taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1526.)
-------------------------------------------

6008.3.

The State Bar may vest in any obligee or trustee the right, in the event of default upon any obligation of the State Bar, to take possession of property of the State Bar, cause the appointment of a receiver for such property, acquire title thereto through foreclosure proceedings, and exercise such other rights and remedies as may be mutually agreed upon between the State Bar and the holder or proposed holder of any such obligation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1526.)
-------------------------------------------

6008.4.

All powers granted to the State Bar by Sections 6001 and 6008.3 may be exercised and carried out by action of its board of trustees. In any resolution, indenture, contract, agreement, or other instrument providing for, creating, or otherwise relating to, any obligation of the State Bar, the board may make, fix, and provide such terms, conditions, covenants, restrictions, and other provisions as the board deems necessary or desirable to
 facilitate the creation, issuance, or sale of such obligation or to provide for the payment or security of such obligation and any interest thereon, including, but not limited to, covenants and agreements relating to fixing and maintaining license fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 14.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6008.6.

The State Bar shall award no contract for goods, services, or both, for an aggregate amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or for information technology goods, services, or both, for an aggregate amount in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), except pursuant to the standards established in Article 4 (commencing with Section 10335) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and approval of the
 board of trustees. In the event that approval for a particular contract by the board is not feasible because approval of the contract is necessary prior to the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board of trustees, the chief executive officer of the State Bar may approve the contract after consultation with and approval by a designated committee of the board and subject to notification of the full board at the board’s next regularly scheduled meeting. The State Bar shall establish a request for proposal procedure by rule, pursuant to the general standards established in Article 4 (commencing with Section 10335) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. For the purposes of this section, “information technology” includes, but is not limited to, all electronic technology systems and services, automated information handling, system design and analysis, conversion voice, video, and data communications, network systems, requisite facilities, equipment, system controls, stimulation,
 electronic commerce, and all related interactions between people and machines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 422, Sec. 3.   (SB 36)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6008.7.

The State Bar shall, by January 1, 2019, develop purchasing policies that align with the purchasing policies of other state agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 422, Sec. 4.   (SB 36)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

6009.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a city, county, or city and county may require attorneys who qualify as lobbyists, as defined by the local jurisdiction, to register and disclose their lobbying activities directed toward the local agencies of those jurisdictions, in the same manner and to the same extent such registration and disclosure is required of nonattorney lobbyists. Any prohibitions against specified activities by lobbyists enacted by a city, county, or city and county shall also apply to attorneys who qualify as
 lobbyists.

(b) For purposes of this section, information about a lobbyist that may be required to be disclosed is:

(1) The name, business address, and telephone number of the lobbyist, of any lobbying firm of which the lobbyist is a partner, owner, officer, or employee; and of any persons or lobbying firms paid to lobby by the lobbyist.

(2) The name, business address, and business telephone number of each client who pays the lobbyist to lobby; the specific matter and agency lobbied, itemized by client; and the amount of money paid to the lobbyist for lobbying and the total expenses of the lobbyist for lobbying, itemized by client.

(3) All gifts or payments made by the lobbyist to officials in the jurisdiction, itemized by the name of the official, the
 amount, date, and description of the gift or payment, and the names of the person making the gift or payment and the person receiving the gift or payment.

(4) All campaign contributions made, arranged, or delivered by the lobbyist to officials in the jurisdiction, specified by amount, date, and name of the official receiving the contribution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6009.3.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is important to inform taxpayers that they may make voluntary contributions to certain funds or programs, as provided on the state income tax return. The Legislature further finds and declares that many taxpayers remain unaware of the voluntary contribution check-offs on the state income tax return. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to encourage all persons who prepare state income tax returns, including attorneys, to inform their clients in writing, prior to the completion of any state income tax return,
 that they may make a contribution to any voluntary contribution check-off on the state income tax return if they so choose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 485, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

6009.5.

The State Bar shall adopt procedures to facilitate reporting of mandatory and voluntary information by providing licensees with a centralized mechanism for reporting information online at the State Bar Internet Web site, including, but not limited to, data required to be provided pursuant to the State Bar Act, or by other statutes, rules, and case law, and demographic information. Any demographic data collected shall be used only for general
 purposes and shall not be identified to any individual licensee or his or her State Bar record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 659, Sec. 15.   (AB 3249)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [6010. - 6034.1.]

6010.

(a) The State Bar is governed by a board known as the board of trustees of the State Bar. The board has the powers and duties conferred by this chapter.

(b) As used in this chapter or any other provision of law, “board of governors” shall be deemed to refer to the board of trustees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 417, Sec. 9.   (SB 163)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6011.

(a) The board shall appoint an executive director of the State Bar, who shall be responsible for the leadership and management of the State Bar according to the strategic direction set by the board.

(b) The board shall appoint a lawyer admitted to practice in California to serve as the executive director of the State Bar. The executive director shall be appointed for a term of four years and may be reappointed for additional four-year
 terms. The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The executive director shall not engage in private practice. The State Bar shall notify the Senate Committee on Rules and the Senate and Assembly Committees on Judiciary within seven days of the dismissal or hiring of an executive director.
